Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-358.08
Information regarding absent parent; duty to furnish; enforcement.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law regarding the confidentiality of records and when not prohibited by the federal Privacy Act of 1974, Public Law 93-579, as amended, each department and agency of state, county, and city government and each employer or other payor as defined in section 43-1709 shall, upon request, furnish to any court-appointed individuals, the county attorney, any authorized attorney, or the Department of Health and Human Services an absent parent's address, social security number, amount of income, health insurance information, and employer's name and address for the exclusive purpose of establishing and collecting child or spousal support. Information so obtained shall be used for no other purpose. This section may be enforced by filing a court action.

Laws 1976, LB 926, § 2;

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 15;

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 44;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 100;

Laws 1996, LB 1296, § 14;

Laws 1997, LB 229, § 15;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 17.